Florida, session 2026, SB1348.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âSubsections (13) through (36) and subsections 12 (37) through (45) of section 420.503, Florida Statutes, are 13 renumbered as subsections (14) through (37) and subsections (39) 14 through (47), respectively, subsection (8) and present 15 subsections (16), (17), and (41) are amended, and new 16 subsections (13) and (38) are added to that section, to read: 17 420.503âDefinitions.âAs used in this part, the term: 18 (8)ââCommunity housing development organizationâ means a 19 nonprofit organization that has among its purposes the provision 20 of affordable housing for low-income families and moderate 21 income families, maintains accountability to low-income 22 community residents, has demonstrated the capacity to carry out 23 affordable housing activities, and has a history of serving the 24 local community. 25 (13)ââDemonstrated capacityâ means the requisite skill, 26 experience, and credit worthiness of a provider of affordable 27 housing projects to successfully construct or rehabilitate 28 affordable housing. Requisite skill, experience, and credit 29 worthiness includes, but is not limited to, the completion of at 30 least three affordable housing projects in the United States, 31 one of which must have been completed in this state, within the 32 preceding 5 years. Each affordable housing project used to 33 demonstrate capacity must involve a qualifying principal acting 34 in the capacity of a qualifying principal in each affordable 35 housing project. 36 (17)(16)ââElderlyâ means persons 62 years of age or older; 37 however, this definition does not prohibit housing from being 38 deemed housing for the elderly as defined in subsection (22) 39 (21) if such housing otherwise meets the requirements of 40 subsection (22) (21). 41 (18)(17)ââEligible housing providerâ means a for-profit 42 developer or not-for-profit developer or a community housing 43 development organization with at least one qualifying principal 44 having the demonstrated the capacity to construct or 45 rehabilitate affordable housing. 46 (38)ââQualifying principalâ means one or more persons 47 owning at least 25 percent of a legally formed corporation, 48 association, joint venture, or partnership. 49 (43)(41)ââSponsorâ means any individual, association, 50 corporation, joint venture, partnership, trust, local 51 government, or other legal entity or any combination thereof 52 which: 53 (a)âHas the demonstrated capacity to construct or 54 rehabilitate affordable housing. 55 (b)(a)âHas been approved by the corporation as qualified to 56 own, construct, acquire, rehabilitate, reconstruct, operate, 57 lease, manage, or maintain a project.; and 58 (c)(b)âExcept for a local government, has agreed to subject 59 itself to the regulatory powers of the corporation. 60 Section 2.âSubsection (2) of section 420.628, Florida 61 Statutes, is amended to read: 62 420.628âAffordable housing for children and young adults 63 leaving foster care; legislative findings and intent.â 64 (2)âYoung adults who leave the child welfare system meet 65 the definition of eligible persons under ss. 420.503(19) and 66 420.9071(11) ss. 420.503(18) and 420.9071(11) for affordable 67 housing, and are encouraged to participate in federal, state, 68 and local affordable housing programs. Students deemed to be 69 eligible occupants under 26 U.S.C. s. 42(i)(3)(D) shall be 70 considered eligible persons for purposes of all projects funded 71 under this chapter. 72 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.